Illinois, session 104th, HB5501.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Procurement Code is amended by 5changing Section 30-30 as follows: 6    (30 ILCS 500/30-30)7    Sec. 30-30. Design-bid-build construction. 8    (a) Except as provided in subsection (a-5), for building 9construction contracts in excess of $250,000, separate 10specifications may be prepared for all equipment, labor, and 11materials in connection with the following 5 subdivisions of 12the work to be performed:13        (1) plumbing;14        (2) heating, piping, refrigeration, and automatic 15    temperature control systems, including the testing and 16    balancing of those systems;17        (3) ventilating and distribution systems for 18    conditioned air, including the testing and balancing of 19    those systems;20        (4) electric wiring; and21        (5) general contract work.22    Except as provided in subsection (a-5), the specifications 23may be so drawn as to permit separate and independent bidding   HB5501 Engrossed- 2 -LRB104 18314 HLH 31754 b1upon each of the 5 subdivisions of work. All contracts awarded 2for any part thereof may award the 5 subdivisions of work 3separately to responsible and reliable persons, firms, or 4corporations engaged in these classes of work. The contracts, 5at the discretion of the construction agency, may be assigned 6to the successful bidder on the general contract work or to the 7successful bidder on the subdivision of work designated by the 8construction agency before the bidding as the prime 9subdivision of work, provided that all payments will be made 10directly to the contractors for the 5 subdivisions of work 11upon compliance with the conditions of the contract.12    For single prime projects: (i) the bid of the successful 13low bidder shall identify the name of the subcontractor, if 14any, and the bid proposal costs for each of the 5 subdivisions 15of work set forth in this Section; (ii) the contract entered 16into with the successful bidder shall provide that no 17identified subcontractor may be terminated without the written 18consent of the Capital Development Board; (iii) the contract 19shall comply with the disadvantaged business practices of the 20Business Enterprise for Minorities, Women, and Persons with 21Disabilities Act and the equal employment practices of Section 222-105 of the Illinois Human Rights Act; and (iv) the Capital 23Development Board shall submit an annual report to the General 24Assembly and Governor on the bidding, award, and performance 25of all single prime projects.26    Until December 31, 2023, for building construction   HB5501 Engrossed- 3 -LRB104 18314 HLH 31754 b1projects with a total construction cost valued at $5,000,000 2or less, the Capital Development Board shall not use the 3single prime procurement delivery method for more than 50% of 4the total number of projects bid for each fiscal year. Until 5December 31, 2023, any project with a total construction cost 6valued greater than $5,000,000 may be bid using single prime 7at the discretion of the Executive Director of the Capital 8Development Board.9    For contracts entered into on or after January 1, 2024, 10the Capital Development Board shall determine whether the 11single prime procurement delivery method is to be pursued. 12Before electing to use single prime on a project, the Capital 13Development Board must make a written determination that must 14include a description as to the particular advantages of the 15single prime procurement method for that project and an 16evaluation of the items in paragraphs (1) through (4). The 17chief procurement officer must review the Capital Development 18Board's determination and consider the adequacy of information 19in paragraphs (1) through (4) to determine whether the Capital 20Development Board may proceed with single prime. Approval by 21the chief procurement officer shall not be unreasonably 22withheld. The following factors must be considered by the 23chief procurement officer in any determination: 24        (1) The benefit that using the single prime 25    procurement method will have on the Capital Development 26    Board's ability to increase participation of   HB5501 Engrossed- 4 -LRB104 18314 HLH 31754 b1    minority-owned firms, woman-owned firms, firms owned by 2    persons with a disability, and veteran-owned firms.3        (2) The likelihood that single prime will be in the 4    best interest of the State by providing a material savings 5    of time or cost over the multiple prime delivery system. 6    The best interest of the State justification must show the 7    specific benefits of using the single prime method, 8    including documentation of the estimates or scheduling 9    impacts of any of the following: project complexity and 10    trade coordination required, length of project, 11    availability of skilled workforce, geographic area, 12    project timelines, project budget, ability to secure 13    minority, women, persons with disabilities and veteran 14    participation, or other information.15        (3) The type and size of the project and its 16    suitability to the single prime procurement method.17        (4) Whether the project will comply with the 18    underrepresented business and equal employment practices 19    of the State, as established in the Business Enterprise 20    for Minorities, Women, and Persons with Disabilities Act, 21    Section 45-57 of this Code, and Section 2-105 of the 22    Illinois Human Rights Act. 23    If the chief procurement officer finds that the Capital 24Development Board's written determination is insufficient, the 25Capital Development Board shall have the opportunity to cure 26its determination. Within 15 days of receiving approval from   HB5501 Engrossed- 5 -LRB104 18314 HLH 31754 b1the chief procurement officer, the Capital Development Board 2shall provide an advisory copy of the written determination to 3the Procurement Policy Board and the Commission on Equity and 4Inclusion. The Capital Development Board must maintain the 5full record of determination for 5 years. 6    (a-5) Beginning on the effective date of this amendatory 7Act of the 104th General Assembly and through December 31, 82032 December 31, 2026, for single prime projects in which a 9public institution of higher education is a construction 10agency awarding building construction contracts in excess of 11$250,000, separate specifications may be prepared for all 12equipment, labor, and materials in connection with the 5 13subdivisions of work enumerated in subsection (a). Any public 14institution of higher education contract awarded for any part 15thereof may award 2 or more of the 5 subdivisions of work 16together or separately to responsible and reliable persons, 17firms, or corporations engaged in these classes of work if: 18(i) the public institution of higher education has submitted 19to the Procurement Policy Board and the Commission on Equity 20and Inclusion a written notice that includes the reasons for 21using the single prime method and an explanation of why the use 22of that method is in the best interest of the State and 23arranges to have the notice posted on the institution's online 24procurement webpage and its online procurement bulletin at 25least 3 business days following submission to the Procurement 26Policy Board and the Commission on Equity and Inclusion; (ii)   HB5501 Engrossed- 6 -LRB104 18314 HLH 31754 b1the successful low bidder has prequalified with the public 2institution of higher education; (iii) the bid of the 3successful low bidder identifies the name of the 4subcontractor, if any, and the bid proposal costs for each of 5the 5 subdivisions of work set forth in subsection (a); (iv) 6the contract entered into with the successful bidder provides 7that no identified subcontractor may be terminated without the 8written consent of the public institution of higher education; 9and (v) the successful low bidder has prequalified with the 10University of Illinois or with the Capital Development Board.11    For building construction projects with a total 12construction cost valued at $20,000,000 or less, public 13institutions of higher education shall not use the single 14prime delivery method for more than 50% of the total number of 15projects bid for each fiscal year. Projects with a total 16construction cost valued at $20,000,000 or more may be bid 17using the single prime delivery method at the discretion of 18the public institution of higher education. With respect to 19any construction project described in this subsection (a-5), 20the public institution of higher education shall: (i) specify 21in writing as a public record that the project shall comply 22with the Business Enterprise for Minorities, Women, and 23Persons with Disabilities Act and the equal employment 24practices of Section 2-105 of the Illinois Human Rights Act; 25and (ii) report annually to the Governor, General Assembly, 26Procurement Policy Board, and Auditor General on the bidding,   HB5501 Engrossed- 7 -LRB104 18314 HLH 31754 b1award, and performance of all single prime projects. On and 2after the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 102nd 3General Assembly, the public institution of higher education 4may award in each fiscal year single prime contracts with an 5aggregate total value of no more than $100,000,000. The Board 6of Trustees of the University of Illinois may award in each 7fiscal year single prime contracts with an aggregate total 8value of not more than $300,000,000. 9    (b) For public institutions of higher education, the 10provisions of this subsection are operative on and after 11December 31, 2032 January 1, 2026. For building construction 12contracts in excess of $250,000, separate specifications shall 13be prepared for all equipment, labor, and materials in 14connection with the following 5 subdivisions of the work to be 15performed:16        (1) plumbing;17        (2) heating, piping, refrigeration, and automatic 18    temperature control systems, including the testing and 19    balancing of those systems;20        (3) ventilating and distribution systems for 21    conditioned air, including the testing and balancing of 22    those systems;23        (4) electric wiring; and24        (5) general contract work.25    The specifications must be so drawn as to permit separate 26and independent bidding upon each of the 5 subdivisions of   HB5501 Engrossed- 8 -LRB104 18314 HLH 31754 b1work. All contracts awarded for any part thereof shall award 2the 5 subdivisions of work separately to responsible and 3reliable persons, firms, or corporations engaged in these 4classes of work. The contracts, at the discretion of the 5construction agency, may be assigned to the successful bidder 6on the general contract work or to the successful bidder on the 7subdivision of work designated by the construction agency 8before the bidding as the prime subdivision of work, provided 9that all payments will be made directly to the contractors for 10the 5 subdivisions of work upon compliance with the conditions 11of the contract. 12    It is the intent of the General Assembly that the 13provisions of subsection (a-5), rather than the provisions of 14this subsection (b), apply continuously from November 21, 2025 15(the effective date of Public Act 104-434) through December 1631, 2032. Any actions taken in reliance on the extension of 17subsection (a-5) in Public Act 104-434 are hereby validated. 18(Source: P.A. 103-570, eff. 1-1-24; 104-434, eff. 11-21-25.) 19    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 20becoming law.